Illinois, session 104th, HB2993.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rebuild Illinois Mental Health Workforce 5Act is amended by changing Section 20-10 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 66/20-10)7    Sec. 20-10. Medicaid funding for community mental health 8services. Medicaid funding for the specific community mental 9health services listed in this Act shall be adjusted and paid 10as set forth in this Act. Such payments shall be paid in 11addition to the base Medicaid reimbursement rate and add-on 12payment rates per service unit. 13    (a) The payment adjustments shall begin on July 1, 2022 14for State Fiscal Year 2023 and shall continue for every State 15fiscal year thereafter.16        (1) Individual Therapy Medicaid Payment rate for 17    services provided under the H0004 Code:18            (A) The Medicaid total payment rate for individual 19        therapy provided by a qualified mental health 20        professional shall be increased by no less than $9 per 21        service unit. 22            (B) The Medicaid total payment rate for individual 23        therapy provided by a mental health professional shall   HB2993- 2 -LRB104 10054 KTG 20125 b1        be increased by no less than $9 per service unit.2        (2) Community Support - Individual Medicaid Payment 3    rate for services provided under the H2015 Code: All 4    community support - individual services shall be increased 5    by no less than $15 per service unit.6        (3) Case Management Medicaid Add-on Payment for 7    services provided under the T1016 code: All case 8    management services rates shall be increased by no less 9    than $15 per service unit.10        (4) Assertive Community Treatment Medicaid Add-on 11    Payment for services provided under the H0039 code: The 12    Medicaid total payment rate for assertive community 13    treatment services shall increase by no less than $8 per 14    service unit.15        (5) Medicaid user-based directed payments. 16            (A) For each State fiscal year, a monthly directed 17        payment shall be paid to a community mental health 18        provider of community support team services based on 19        the number of Medicaid users of community support team 20        services documented by Medicaid fee-for-service and 21        managed care encounter claims delivered by that 22        provider in the base year. The Department of 23        Healthcare and Family Services shall make the monthly 24        directed payment to each provider entitled to directed 25        payments under this Act by no later than the last day 26        of each month throughout each State fiscal year.  HB2993- 3 -LRB104 10054 KTG 20125 b1                (i) The monthly directed payment for a 2            community support team provider shall be 3            calculated as follows: The sum total number of 4            individual Medicaid users of community support 5            team services delivered by that provider 6            throughout the base year, multiplied by $4,200 per 7            Medicaid user, divided into 12 equal monthly 8            payments for the State fiscal year. 9                (ii) As used in this subparagraph, "user" 10            means an individual who received at least 200 11            units of community support team services (H2016) 12            during the base year.13            (B) For each State fiscal year, a monthly directed 14        payment shall be paid to each community mental health 15        provider of assertive community treatment services 16        based on the number of Medicaid users of assertive 17        community treatment services documented by Medicaid 18        fee-for-service and managed care encounter claims 19        delivered by the provider in the base year. 20                (i) The monthly direct payment for an 21            assertive community treatment provider shall be 22            calculated as follows: The sum total number of 23            Medicaid users of assertive community treatment 24            services provided by that provider throughout the 25            base year, multiplied by $6,000 per Medicaid user, 26            divided into 12 equal monthly payments for that   HB2993- 4 -LRB104 10054 KTG 20125 b1            State fiscal year. 2                (ii) As used in this subparagraph, "user" 3            means an individual that received at least 300 4            units of assertive community treatment services 5            during the base year.6            (B-5) Beginning January 1, 2026, for each State 7        fiscal year, a monthly directed payment shall be paid 8        to each community mental health provider of community 9        support individual services based on the number of 10        Medicaid users of community support individual 11        services documented by Medicaid fee-for-service and 12        managed care encounter claims delivered by the 13        provider in the base year. The monthly direct payment 14        for a community support individual provider shall be 15        calculated as follows: The sum total number of 16        Medicaid users of community support individual 17        services provided by that provider throughout the base 18        year, multiplied by $2,400 per Medicaid user, divided 19        into 12 equal monthly payments for that State fiscal 20        year.21            As used in this subparagraph, "user" means an 22        individual that received at least 100 units of 23        community support individual services during the base 24        year. 25            (C) The base year for directed payments under this 26        Section shall be calendar year 2019 for State Fiscal   HB2993- 5 -LRB104 10054 KTG 20125 b1        Year 2023 and State Fiscal Year 2024. For the State 2        fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2024, and for every 3        State fiscal year thereafter, the base year shall be 4        the calendar year that ended 18 months prior to the 5        start of the State fiscal year in which payments are 6        made.7            (D) The Department must adjust and pay community 8        mental health providers for any payments authorized 9        under this paragraph (5) for all services from a 10        community mental health provider which have been paid 11        by a Medicaid managed care organization but no 12        encounter claim has been recorded in the Departments' 13        Enterprise Data Warehouse. The Department must develop 14        a process for community mental health providers to 15        reconcile these payments and submit claims for which 16        the Department has not used for making payments. The 17        Department may sanction Medicaid managed care 18        organizations for services not received by the 19        Department. 20    (b) Subject to federal approval, a one-time directed 21payment must be made in calendar year 2023 for community 22mental health services provided by community mental health 23providers. The one-time directed payment shall be for an 24amount appropriated for these purposes. The one-time directed 25payment shall be for services for Integrated Assessment and 26Treatment Planning and other intensive services, including,   HB2993- 6 -LRB104 10054 KTG 20125 b1but not limited to, services for Mobile Crisis Response, 2crisis intervention, and medication monitoring. The amounts 3and services used for designing and distributing these 4one-time directed payments shall not be construed to require 5any future rate or funding increases for the same or other 6mental health services. 7    (c) The following payment adjustments shall be made:8        (1) Subject to federal approval, beginning on January 9    1, 2024, the Department shall introduce rate increases to 10    behavioral health services no less than by the following 11    targeted pool for the specified services provided by 12    community mental health centers:13            (A) Mobile Crisis Response, $6,800,000;14            (B) Crisis Intervention, $4,000,000;15            (C) Integrative Assessment and Treatment Planning 16        services, $10,500,000;17            (D) Group Therapy, $1,200,000;18            (E) Family Therapy, $500,000;19            (F) Community Support Group, $4,000,000; and20            (G) Medication Monitoring, $3,000,000.21        (2) Rate increases shall be determined with 22    significant input from Illinois behavioral health trade 23    associations and advocates. The Department must use 24    service units delivered under the fee-for-service and 25    managed care programs by community mental health centers 26    during State Fiscal Year 2022. These services are used for   HB2993- 7 -LRB104 10054 KTG 20125 b1    distributing the targeted pools and setting rates but do 2    not prohibit the Department from paying providers not 3    enrolled as community mental health centers the same rate 4    if providing the same services.5    (d) Rate simplification for team-based services.6        (1) The Department shall work with stakeholders to 7    redesign reimbursement rates for behavioral health 8    team-based services established under the Rehabilitation 9    Option of the Illinois Medicaid State Plan supporting 10    individuals with chronic or complex behavioral health 11    conditions and crisis services. Subject to federal 12    approval, the redesigned rates shall seek to introduce 13    bundled payment systems that minimize provider claiming 14    activities while transitioning the focus of treatment 15    towards metrics and outcomes. Federally approved rate 16    models shall seek to ensure reimbursement levels are no 17    less than the State's total reimbursement for similar 18    services in calendar year 2023, including all service 19    level payments, add-ons, and all other payments specified 20    in this Section.21        (2) In State Fiscal Year 2024, the Department shall 22    identify an existing, or establish a new, Behavioral 23    Health Outcomes Stakeholder Workgroup to help inform the 24    identification of metrics and outcomes for team-based 25    services.26        (3) In State Fiscal Year 2025, subject to federal   HB2993- 8 -LRB104 10054 KTG 20125 b1    approval, the Department shall introduce a 2    pay-for-performance model for team-based services to be 3    informed by the Behavioral Health Outcomes Stakeholder 4    Workgroup.5    (e) Beginning January 1, 2026, the Department must 6increase the on-site and off-site rates for family therapy, 7individual therapy, community support individual, targeted 8case management, and assessment and treatment planning 9services provided by mental health professionals (Modifier 10HN), qualified mental health professionals (Modifier HO) and 11psychologists with masters degree (Modifier AH). The increased 12rates for all these services must be 5% higher than the rates 13in effect January 1, 2025 and no service provided by the same 14staff level may be less than any other service increased under 15the provisions of this Section. The Department must also 16increase the hourly rate for intensive outpatient services for 17children to no less that $100. 18(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23; 19103-102, eff. 7-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)